cs: Tvar kostek: Kostka (6 stěn); Dvanáctistěn (12 stěn); Dvacetistěn (20 stěn); Osmistěn (8 stěn); Pětiúhelníkový lichoběžník (10 stěn); Čtyřstěn (4 stěny); Jiné
ro-RO: Formă zaruri: Cub (6 laturi); Dodecaedru (12 laturi); Icosaedru (20 de laturi); Octaedru (8 laturi); Trapezoedru pentagonal (10 laturi); Tetraedru (4 laturi); Altele
zh-TW: 骰子形狀: 立方體 (6 面); 十二面體 (12 面); 二十面體 (20 面); 八面體 (8 面); 五邊形梯面 (10 邊); 四面體 (4 面); 其他
ja: サイコロの形: キューブ(6面); 大十二面体(12面); 大二十面体(20面); 大八面体 (8面); 五角台形 (10面); 大四面体 (4面); その他
zh-CN: 骰子形状: 立方体（6 面）; 十二面体（12 面）; 二十面体（20 面）; 八面体（8 面）; 五方偏方面体（10 面体）; 四面体（4 面）; 其他
nl: Dobbelsteenvorm: Kubus (6 zijden); Dodecaëder (12 zijden); Icosaëder (20 zijden); Octaëder (8 zijden); Vijfhoekige trapezoëder (10 zijden); Tetraëder (4 zijden); Andere
it: Forma del dado da gioco: Cubo (6 facce); Dodecaedro (12 facce); Icosaedro (20 facce); Ottaedro (8 facce); Trapezoedro pentagonale (10 facce); Tetraedro (4 facce); Altro
sk-SK: Tvar kocky: Kocka (6 strán); Dvanásťsten (12 strán); Ikosahedrón (20 strán); Osemsten (8 strán); Päťuholníkový lichobežník (10 strán); Štvorsten (4 strany); Iné
bg-BG: Форма на зарове: Куб (6 страни); Додекаедър (12 страни); Икосаедър (20 страни); Октаедър (8 страни); Петоъгълен трапецоедър (10 страни); Тетраедър (4 страни); Други
hu: Dobókocka alakja: Kocka (6 oldalú); Dodekaéder (12 oldalú); Ikozaéder (20 oldalú); Oktaéder (8 oldalú); Ötszögletű trapezoéder (10 oldalú); Tetraéder (4 oldalú); Egyéb
lt-LT: Kauliuko forma: Kubas (6 sienelės); Dodekaedras (12 sienelių); Ikosaedras (20 sienelių); Oktaedras (8 sienelės); Penkiakampis trapecoedras (10 sienelių); Tetraedras (4 sienelės); Kita
en: Dice shape: Cube (6 sides); Dodecahedron (12 sides); Icosahedron (20 sides); Octahedron (8 sides); Pentagonal trapezohedron (10 sides); Tetrahedron (4 sides); Other
sv: Tärningsform: Kub (6 sidor); Dodekaeder (12 sidor); Ikosahedron (20 sidor); Oktaeder (8 sidor); Pentagonal trapezoeder (10 sidor); Tetraeder (4 sidor); Annat
de: Würfelform: Würfel (6 Seiten); Dodekaeder (12 Seiten); Ikosaeder (20 Seiten); Oktaeder (8 Seiten); Fünfeckiges Trapezoeder (10 Seiten); Tetraeder (4 Seiten); Sonstiges
es: Forma de dados: Cubo (6 lados); Dodecaedro (12 lados); Dodecaedro (20 lados); Octaedro (8 lados); Trapezoedro pentagonal (10 lados); Tetraedro (4 caras); Otros
el: Σχήμα ζαριού: Κύβος (6 πλευρές); Δωδεκάεδρο (12 πλευρές); Εικοσάεδρο (20 πλευρές); Οκτάεδρο (8 πλευρές); Πενταγωνικό τραπεζόεδρο (10 πλευρές); Τετράεδρο (4 πλευρές); Άλλο
da: Terningform: Terning (6 sider); Dodecahedron (12 sider); Icosahedron (20 sider); Oktahedron (8 sides); Femkantet trapezhedron (10 sider); Tetraeder (4 sider); Andet
pl: Kształt kostki: Kostka (6 boków); Dwunastościan (12 boków); Dwudziestościan (20 boków); Ośmiościan (8 boków); Trapez pięciokątny (10 boków); Czworościan (4 boki); Pozostałe
vi: Hình dáng xúc xắc: Khối lập phương (6 mặt); Khối thập nhị diện (12 mặt); Hình nhị thập diện (20 mặt); Hình bát diện (8 mặt); Hình thang ngũ giác (10 mặt); Hình tứ (4 mặt); Khác
pt-PT: Formato de dado: Cubo (6 faces); Dodecaedro (12 faces); Icosaedro (20 faces); Octaedro (8 faces); Trapezoedro pentagonal (10 faces); Tetraedro (4 faces); Outro
sl-SI: Oblika kocke: Kocka (6 strani); Dodekaeder (12 strani); Ikozaeder (20 strani); Oktaeder (8 strani); Peterokotni trapezoeder (10 strani); Tetraeder (4 strani); Drugo
fi: Nopan muoto: Kuutio (6 sivua); Dodekaedri (12 sivua); Ikosaedri (20 sivua); Oktaedri (8 sivua); Viisikulmainen trapetsoedri (10 sivua); Tetraedri (4 sivua); Muu
th: รูปร่างลูกเต๋า: คิวบ์ (6 ด้าน); สิบสองหน้า (12 ด้าน); ยี่สิบหน้า (20 ด้าน); แปดหน้า (8 ด้าน); เทรปโซฮีดรอนห้าเหลี่ยม (10 ด้าน); ทรงสี่หน้า (4 ด้าน); อื่นๆ
ru: Форма игральной кости: Куб (6 сторон); Додекаэдр (12 сторон); Икосаэдр (20 сторон); Октаэдр (8 сторон); Пятиугольный трапецоэдр (10 сторон); Тетраэдр (4 стороны); Другая
pt-BR: Formato do dado: Cubo (6 lados); Dodecaedro (12 lados); Icosaedro (20 lados); Octaedro (8 lados); Trapezoide pentagonal (10 lados); Tetraedro (4 lados); Outro
hr-HR: Oblik kockica: Kocka (šest strana); Dodekaedar (12 strana); Ikosaedar (20 strana); Oktaedar (osam strana); Peterokutni trapezoedar (10 strana); Tetraedar (četiri strane); Ostalo
tr: Zar şekli: Küp (6 yüzlü); Dodecahedron (12 yüz); Icosahedron (20 yüz); Oktahedron (8 taraf); Beşgen trapezohedron (10 yüzlü); Tetrahedron (4 yüzlü); Diğer
ko: 주사위 모양: 큐브(6면); 정십이면체(12면); 정이십면체(20면); 팔면체(8면); 오각형 사다리꼴(10면); 사면체(4면); 기타
fr: Forme du dé: Cube (6 côtés); Dodécaèdre (12 côtés); Icosaèdre (20 côtés); Octaèdre (8 côtés); Trapézoèdre pentagonal (10 côtés); Tétraèdre (4 côtés); Autre
nb: Terningform: Kube (6 sider); Dodekaeder (12 sider); Ikosaeder (20 sider); Oktaeder (8 sider); Femkantet trapesoeder (10 sider); Tetraeder (4 sider); Annen